California, session 20252026, SB870.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) Decorative tabletop fire features Fuel-burning portable devices that burn pourable or refillable liquid fuels, including, but not limited to, isopropyl alcohol, ethanol, and bioethanol, in open reservoirs have been involved in a significant number of serious and catastrophic burn injuries and fatalities.(2) The United States Consumer Product Safety Commission has reported two deaths and at least 60 serious burn injuries since 2019 related to this product category.(3) These products products, if they do not comply with the voluntary safety standard of the American Society for Testing Materials, ASTM F3363-25 “Standard Specification for Unvented Liquid/Gel Fuel-Burning Portable Devices,” present hazards that are not reasonably obvious to typical consumers, including the risk of “flame jetting,” which is sudden flame discharge when fuel is added to a still-hot burner, and “pool fire,” which is ignition of pooled or spilled liquid fuel, and can result in flame temperatures exceeding 1,600 degrees Fahrenheit and third-degree burns in less than one second.(4) Many of the products on the market do not comply with the voluntary safety standard of the American Society for Testing Materials, ASTM F3363-19 F3363-25 “Standard Specification for Unvented Liquid/Gel Fuel-Burning Portable Devices,” which is designed to mitigate these risks.(5) Although decorative flame features fuel-burning portable devices may have aesthetic and ambience value, tabletop pourable liquid fuel burners fuel-burning portable devices that are only used for ambience purposes may offer minimal utility compared with known, safer alternatives, including, but not limited to, listed propane tabletop fire appliances, sealed-cartridge ethanol burners, and electric flame simulators. utility.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to protect public health and safety by prohibiting the sale in this state of high-risk tabletop liquid-fuel fire features fuel-burning portable devices that do not meet rigorous safety standards, and to ensure only products that meet safe design requirements are sold.SEC. 2. Part 9 (commencing with Section 14960) is added to Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code, to read:PART 9. Tabletop Liquid-Fuel Fire Features Fuel-Burning Portable Devices14960.For purposes of this part, all the following definitions apply:(a)“Tabletop liquid-fuel fire feature” means a portable decorative appliance marketed or intended for indoor or outdoor residential use that meets all of the following criteria:(1)Burns a liquid or gel fuel, including, but not limited to, isopropyl alcohol, ethanol, bioethanol, or any pourable flammable liquid, in an open reservoir or bowl.(2)Permits or requires the consumer to pour or refill liquid or gel fuel into the burner while the burner is attached or while the fuel reservoir is exposed.(3)Is designed or marketed as suitable for placement on a table, countertop, patio surface, or other nonfloor stationary surface for decorative flame presentation, including, but not limited to, devices marketed for s’mores, ambience, interior use, or portable fireplaces.(b)“Unsafe tabletop liquid-fuel fire feature” means a tabletop liquid-fuel fire feature that does not comply with the safety standard of the American Society for Testing Materials, ASTM F3363-19 “Standard Specification for Unvented Liquid/Gel Fuel-Burning Portable Devices.”14965.(a)Except as specified in subdivision (b), on and after January 1, 2027, a person shall not sell, offer for sale, or distribute an unsafe tabletop liquid-fuel fire feature.(b)Subdivision (a) does not apply to the interstate transportation of an unsafe tabletop liquid-fuel fire feature.14960. (a) On and after January 1, 2027, a person shall not sell, offer for sale, or distribute in commerce in this state a fuel-burning portable device that does not comply with the safety standard of the American Society for Testing Materials, ASTM F3363-25 “Standard Specification for Unvented Liquid/Gel Fuel-Burning Portable Devices,” any update to that standard, or any successor ASTM standard.(b) For purposes of this section, “fuel-burning portable device” has the same meaning as defined in the safety standard of the American Society for Testing Materials, ASTM F3363-25 “Standard Specification for Unvented Liquid/Gel Fuel-Burning Portable Devices,” any update to that standard, or any successor ASTM standard.(c) This section applies to any fuel-burning portable device manufactured on or after January 1, 2027.(d) A violation of this section constitutes unfair competition and shall be enforced pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code.